Nebraska, session 109, LB499.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-1802, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1802 (1) The A Crime Victim's Reparations Committee is hereby created.
The committee shall consist of five members of the commission and three public
members to be appointed by the Governor, subject to approval by the
Legislature, as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) Until successors are appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) of this
section, one One public member shall represent charitable organizations, one
public member shall represent businesses, and one public member, who has
training and relevant work experience with victims and survivors of crime,
shall represent crime victims.
(b) Five public members shall be appointed within thirty days after the
effective date of this act as follows:
(i) Two public members that represent charitable organizations engaged in
providing services to victims, dependents, and relatives of victims. At least
one such member shall represent charitable organizations engaged in providing
services to victims of sexual assault as defined by section 28-319, 28-319.01,
or 28-320, human trafficking as defined by section 28-830, or domestic abuse as
defined by section 42-903;
(ii) Two public members that have training and relevant work experience
with victims, dependents, and relatives of victims. At least one such member
shall have training and relevant work experience with victims of sexual assault
as defined by section 28-319, 28-319.01, or 28-320, human trafficking as
defined by section 28-830, or domestic abuse as defined by section 42-903; and
(iii) One public member who is a victim.
(3) The members of the committee shall select a chairperson who is a
member of the commission.
Sec. 2. Section 81-1803, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1803 (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 81-1802 or subsection
(2) of this section, a member Members of the committee shall serve for a term
terms of four years. The term of each public member shall begin on October 1.
(2) One of the two public members appointed pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)
(i) of section 81-1802 shall serve a two-year term. One of the two public
members appointed pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)(ii) of section 81-1802 shall
serve a two-year term. Thereafter, all members shall serve four-year terms.
Sec. 3. Section 81-1804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1804 When a vacancy occurs on the committee, appointment to fill the
vacancy shall be made for the balance of the term. A member whose term has As
the terms of the initial appointees to the committee expire, succeeding
appointees shall be appointed to four-year terms. Members whose terms have
expired shall continue to serve until a successor has their successors have
been appointed.
Sec. 4. Original sections 81-1802, 81-1803, and 81-1804, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-1-